District of Columbia statutes.
22-3314

Destroying cemetery railing or tomb.

If any person shall maliciously cut down, demolish, or otherwise injure any railing, fence, or inclosure around or upon any cemetery, or shall injure or deface any tomb or inscription thereon, such person shall be fined not more than $100.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1327, ch. 854, § 850
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 2(v), 41 DCR 1639

Cross References

Burning of cross or other religious symbol, see § 22-3312.02.
Defacement of public or private building or property, see § 22-3312.01.
Wearing of masks for particular purposes, see § 22-3312.03.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-3114.
1973 Ed., § 22-3114.